Utah statutes.
70D-3-203.   Initial licensure procedure.

(1)  To apply for licensure under this chapter an individual shall:

(a)  file an application with the commissioner in a form prescribed by the commissioner in rule;

(b)  demonstrate that the individual provided the information to the nationwide database required by 12 U.S.C. Sec. 5104;

(c)  provide the commissioner the individual's unique identifier;

(d)  consent to the commissioner receiving information obtained by the nationwide database under 12 U.S.C. Sec. 5104, including the results of a criminal history background check; and

(e)  notwithstanding the requirements applicable to a regulatory fee under Section 63J-1-504, pay a fee of $200.

(2)  The commissioner shall grant an individual a license if the commissioner finds that the individual complies with:

(a)  Subsection (1); and

(b)  the qualifications for a license under Section 70D-3-202.

(3)  Subject to this chapter, the commissioner may make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, concerning:

(a)  the form of an application under this chapter;

(b)  the content of an application under this chapter; and

(c)  the procedures for filing an application under this chapter.

